Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child safety system”  means a device or system for restraining, seating or positioning
a child within a motor vehicle, including a device or system that  is portable or detachable
from a motor  vehicle or a device or system that a purchaser can integrate with or use to
replace a child safety system built into the motor vehicle.
(b) “Federal standard” means a specification for child restraint systems that the National
Highway Traffic Safety Administration has adopted under  49 C.F.R. 571.213 as of the effective
date of this 2026 Act.
(c) “Motor vehicle” means a  motor vehicle that is designed primarily to transport indi-
viduals with seating for  one or more passengers side-by-side with the operator of the motor
vehicle.
(d) “Purchaser” means an individual resident of this state.
(e) “Retailer” means a person that sells or offers for sale a child safety system.
(f)(A) “Retail platform operator” means a person that operates an online or  other mar-
ketplace that enables purchasers to select, pay for and receive a child safety system and:
(i) Offers child safety systems  for sale by the person or by other, third party sellers that
offer goods through the marketplace for which the marketplace is the seller of record; or
(ii) Fulfills orders  for child safety systems through a centralized fulfillment, distribution
or warehouse network  and from inventory that the person owns, leases or otherwise con-
trols.
(B) “Retail platform operator” does not include:
(i) A financial institution, as defined in  ORS 706.008, a payment processor or payment
clearance system operator; or
(ii) A  person that facilitates transactions on behalf of a retailer that is the seller of re-
cord and fulfillment occurs from a physical retail location of the retailer.
(2) A retailer may  not knowingly sell or offer for sale to a purchaser, and a retail plat-
form operator may not knowingly permit a retailer to sell  or offer for sale to a purchaser,
a child safety system intended for use in a motor vehicle that does not meet  the federal
standard or standards the Department of Transportation adopts under ORS 815.055.
Enrolled House Bill 4092 (HB 4092-A) Page 1
(3) A retail platform operator may not permit a retailer to advertise or offer for sale  on
the operator’s retail platform a child safety system  that is intended for use in a motor ve-
hicle and is available for purchase and delivery to a  purchaser unless the retailer
affirmatively discloses in  writing to the retail platform operator whether the child safety
system complies with the federal standard  or standards the Department of Transportation
adopts under ORS 815.055.
(4) A  person that violates subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall, upon a written de-
mand from a purchaser, cure the violation within 30 days after  receiving the purchaser’s
demand.
(5)(a) A purchaser who delivers a written  demand under subsection (4) of this section
may, within 30 days after the date of the purchaser’s demand,  bring an action in a court of
this state against a person that fails to cure a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of this  sec-
tion. The purchaser may obtain in the action:
(A) The greater of the purchaser’s actual damages or statutory damages of $500; and
(B) Such other equitable relief as the court may specify.
(b) The court may award attorney fees and costs at trial and on appeal to a prevailing
plaintiff.
Passed by House February 18, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 26, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4092 (HB 4092-A) Page 2